New York, session 2025-2026, A4009.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The closing paragraph of section 230.34 of the penal law, 2 as added by chapter 74 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 Sex trafficking is a [class B] class A-II felony. 5 § 2. The closing paragraph of section 230.34-a of the penal law, as 6 added by chapter 189 of the laws of 2018, is amended to read as follows: 7 Sex trafficking of a child is a [class B] class A-II felony. 8 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 9 ing the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00873-01-5